test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-42vari_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vari: # Noun (42) vari 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    vari+N+Sg+Nom: vari
    vari+N+Sg+Gen: varʼo
    vari+N+Sg+Par: varjo
    vari+N+Sg+Ill: varjo
    vari+N+Sg+Ine: [varʼon, varʼoh, varʼohn]
    vari+N+Sg+Ela: varʼost
    vari+N+Sg+All: varʼolõ
    vari+N+Sg+Ade: varʼol
    vari+N+Sg+Abl: varʼolt
    vari+N+Sg+Tra: varʼos
    vari+N+Sg+Ter: varʼoniq
    vari+N+Sg+Abe: varʼoldaq
    vari+N+Sg+Com: varʼogaq
    vari+N+Pl+Nom: varʼoq
    vari+N+Pl+Gen: [varjõ, varja]
    vari+N+Pl+Par: [varjõ, varja]
    vari+N+Pl+Ill: [varjõhe, varjõ, varjõdõ, varjahe, varja, varjadõ]
    vari+N+Pl+Ine: [varʼõn, varʼõh, varʼõhn, varʼan, varʼah, varʼahn]
    vari+N+Pl+Ela: [varʼõst, varʼast]
    vari+N+Pl+All: [varʼõlõ, varʼalõ]
    vari+N+Pl+Ade: [varʼõl, varʼal]
    vari+N+Pl+Abl: [varʼõlt, varʼalt]
    vari+N+Pl+Tra: [varʼõs, varʼas]
    vari+N+Pl+Ter: [varʼõniq, varʼaniq]
    vari+N+Pl+Abe: [varʼõldaq, varʼaldaq]
    vari+N+Pl+Com: [varjõgaq, varjagaq]
